Hawaii statutes.
[§457A-1.5] Definitions. As used in
this chapter:

"Certified nurse aide" means a nurse
aide who has met the requirements for certification under section 457A-7 or
457A-8.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Medicare or medicaid certified nursing
facility" means any intermediate care facility or skilled nursing facility
licensed pursuant to section 321-11(10) and certified by the department of
health in accordance with 42 United States Code sections 1395i-3 and 1396r.

"Medicare or medicaid nurse aide"
means a certified nurse aide who works in a medicare or medicaid certified
nursing facility.

"Nurse aide" means a person who
performs a variety of duties relating to patients and patient care while
working under the supervision of a nurse, including assisting patients in all
activities of daily living such as serving and collecting food trays, and
helping patients get out of bed, bathe, and dress. A nurse aide may also
assist a nurse by changing bed linens, delivering messages, and sterilizing
instruments.

"State-licensed or state-certified health
care settings" means health care settings, other than a medicare or
medicaid certified nursing facilities, which are regulated by the department of
health or the department of human services.

"Substantiated finding" means
documentation of an investigation by the State that leads the State to conclude
that an allegation is valid, including:

(1) The nature of the allegation and the evidence
that led to the conclusion;

(2) The date of the hearing, if the individual chose
to have one, and its outcome;

(3) A statement of the individual disputing the
allegation, if the individual chose to make one; or

(4) A criminal conviction. [L 2007, c 226, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next